Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB919.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. Exemption from fees.(a) Exemption.--An eligible applicant who is at least 65 years of age shall be exempt from all fees related to the administration of this act and may only be required to pay the costs of a standard-issued driver's license or photo identification card.(b) Fees.--The department shall establish reasonable and appropriate fees in order to administer this section.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. Any regulations inconsistent with this act are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0919PN0968 - 2 - 123